Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-345.04
Seal cards; authorized; requirements.

A lottery by the sale of pickle cards may be conducted utilizing a seal card comprised of a board or placard that contains a seal or seals which, when removed or opened, reveal predesignated winning numbers, letters, symbols, or any combination thereof. All rules governing the handling of prizes awarded in conjunction with seal cards shall be posted prominently in the area where such pickle card units are played.

Laws 1996, LB 1277, § 1.